Utah statutes.
40-8-11.   Budget of administrative expenses -- Procedure -- Division authority to appoint or employ consultants.

(1) The division, with the approval of the board, shall prepare a budget of the administrative expenses in carrying out the provisions of this act for the fiscal year next following the convening of the Legislature. This budget shall be submitted to the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources for inclusion in the governor's appropriation request to the Legislature.

(2)  The division shall have authority to appoint or employ technical support or consultants in the pursuit of the objectives of this act and shall be responsible for coordination with other agencies in matters relating to mined land reclamation and the application of related laws.



Amended by Chapter 201, 1983 General Session

